root/usr/share/postgresql/8.4/tsearch_data/czech.affix
flag *J:
   AT    > -AT,áM
   AT    > -AT,áš
   AT    > -AT,á
   AT    > -AT,áME
   AT    > -AT,áTE
   AT    > -T,Jí
   AT    > -T,JE
   AT    > -T,JíC
   AT    > -T,JíCE
   AT    > -AT,EJ
   AT    > -AT,EJTE
   AT    > -AT,EJME
   AT    > -T,L
   AT    > -T,LA
   AT    > -T,LO
   AT    > -T,LI
   AT    > -T,LY
   [^L]áT    > -T,M
   [^L]áT    > -T,š
   [^L]áT    > -T,
   [^L]áT    > -T,ME
   [^L]áT    > -T,TE
   [^L]áT    > -áT,AJí
   [^L]áT    > -áT,AJE
   [^L]áT    > -áT,AJíC
   [^L]áT    > -áT,AJíCE
   [^L]áT    > -áT,EJ
   [^L]áT    > -áT,EJTE
   [^L]áT    > -áT,EJME
   LáT    > -áT,ANU
   LáT    > -áT,ANEš
   LáT    > -áT,ANE
   LáT    > -áT,ANEME
   LáT    > -áT,ANETE
   LáT    > -áT,ANOU
   LáT    > -áT,ANA
   LáT    > -áT,ANOUC
   LáT    > -áT,ANOUCE
   LáT    > -áT,Aň
   LáT    > -áT,AňME
   LáT    > -áT,AňTE
   [^Lž]áT    > -áT,AL
   [^Lž]áT    > -áT,ALA
   [^Lž]áT    > -áT,ALO
   [^Lž]áT    > -áT,ALI
   [^Lž]áT    > -áT,ALY
   [Lž]áT    > -T,L
   [Lž]áT    > -T,LA
   [Lž]áT    > -T,LO
   [Lž]áT    > -T,LI
   [Lž]áT    > -T,LY
   ET    > -ET,íM
   ET    > -ET,íš
   ET    > -ET,í
   ET    > -ET,íME
   ET    > -ET,íTE
   [Eě]T    > -T,Jí
   [Eě]T    > -T,JE
   [Eě]T    > -T,JíC
   [Eě]T    > -T,JíCE
   [Eě]T    > -T,J
   [Eě]T    > -T,JME
   [Eě]T    > -T,JTE
   ěT    > -ěT,íM
   ěT    > -ěT,íš
   ěT    > -ěT,í
   ěT    > -ěT,íME
   ěT    > -ěT,íTE
   íT    > -T,M
   íT    > -T,š
   íT    > -T,
   íT    > -T,ME
   íT    > -T,TE
   [BDFMNPTVW]íT    > -íT,ěJí
   [BDFMNPTVW]íT    > -íT,ěJE
   [BDFMNPTVW]íT    > -íT,ěJíC
   [BDFMNPTVW]íT    > -íT,ěJíCE
   [^BDFMNPTVWčř]íT    > -íT,EJí
   [^BDFMNPTVWčř]íT    > -íT,EJE
   [^BDFMNPTVWčř]íT    > -íT,EJíC
   [^BDFMNPTVWčř]íT    > -íT,EJíCE
   íT    > -íT,I
   [BDFMNPTVW]íT    > -íT,ěME
   [^BDFMNPTVW]íT    > -íT,EME
   [BDFMNPTVW]íT    > -íT,ěTE
   [^BDFMNPTVW]íT    > -íT,ETE
   [BDFMNPTVW]íT    > -íT,ěL
   [BDFMNPTVW]íT    > -íT,ěLA
   [BDFMNPTVW]íT    > -íT,ěLO
   [BDFMNPTVW]íT    > -íT,ěLI
   [BDFMNPTVW]íT    > -íT,ěLY
   [^BDFMNPTVWč]íT    > -íT,EL
   [^BDFMNPTVWč]íT    > -íT,ELA
   [^BDFMNPTVWč]íT    > -íT,ELO
   [^BDFMNPTVWč]íT    > -íT,ELI
   [^BDFMNPTVWč]íT    > -íT,ELY
   číT    > -íT,IL
   číT    > -íT,ILA
   číT    > -íT,ILO
   číT    > -íT,ILI
   číT    > -íT,ILY
   áM    > -M,š
   áM    > -M,
   áM    > E
   áM    > -M,TE
   áM    > -áM,AJí
   áM    > -áM,AJE
   áM    > -áM,AJíC
   áM    > -áM,AJíCE
   áM    > -éM,EJ
   áM    > -éM,EJME
   áM    > -éM,EJTE
   íM    > -M,š
   íM    > -M,
   íM    > E
   íM    > -M,TE
   íM    > -íM,EJí
   íM    > -íM,EJ
   íM    > -íM,EJME
   íM    > -íM,EJTE
   [^áíUS]T    > -T,L
   [^áíUS]T    > -T,LA
   [^áíUS]T    > -T,LO
   [^áíUS]T    > -T,LI
   [^áíUS]T    > -T,LY
   áST    > -áST,ADNU
   áST    > -áST,ADNEš
   áST    > -áST,ADNE
   áST    > -áST,ADNEME
   áST    > -áST,ADNETE
   áST    > -áST,ADNOU
   áST    > -áST,ADNI
   áST    > -áST,ADNěME
   áST    > -áST,ADNěTE
   áST    > -áST,ADL
   áST    > -áST,ADLA
   áST    > -áST,ADLO
   áST    > -áST,ADLI
   áST    > -áST,ADLY
   íST    > -ST,M
   íST    > -ST,š
   íST    > -ST,
   íST    > -ST,ME
   íST    > -ST,TE
   [DNT]íST    > -íST,ěDí
   [DNT]íST    > -íST,ěZ
   [DNT]íST    > -íST,ěZME
   [DNT]íST    > -íST,ěZTE
   [DNT]íST    > -íST,ěDL
   [DNT]íST    > -íST,ěDLA
   [DNT]íST    > -íST,ěDLO
   [DNT]íST    > -íST,ěDLI
   [DNT]íST    > -íST,ěDLY
   [^DNT]íST    > -íST,EDí
   [^DNT]íST    > -íST,EZ
   [^DNT]íST    > -íST,EZME
   [^DNT]íST    > -íST,EZTE
   [^DNT]íST    > -íST,EDL
   [^DNT]íST    > -íST,EDLA
   [^DNT]íST    > -íST,EDLO
   [^DNT]íST    > -íST,EDLI
   [^DNT]íST    > -íST,EDLY
   T    > I
   OUT    > -OUT,U
   OUT    > -OUT,Eš
   OUT    > -OUT,E
   OUT    > -OUT,EME
   OUT    > -OUT,ETE
   OUT    > -T,
   OUT    > -OUT,A
   OUT    > -T,C
   OUT    > -T,CE
   OUT    > -OUT,I
   OUT    > -OUT,ěME
   OUT    > -OUT,ěTE
   OUT    > -OUT,UL
   OUT    > -OUT,ULA
   OUT    > -OUT,ULO
   OUT    > -OUT,ULI
   OUT    > -OUT,ULY
