root/usr/share/postgresql/8.4/tsearch_data/czech.dict
aplikovávat/JTN
bdít/JN
blekotávat/JN
bojkotovávat/JTN
broukávat/JTN
burcovávat/JTN
cementovávat/JTN
cucávat/JTN
cválávat/JN
čerpat/JTN
čnět/JN
darovávat/JTN
děkovávat/JN
devastovávat/JTN
dloubat/AJTN
dobelhat/JN
dobourávat/JTN
doburácet/JN
docucávat/JTN
dočechrat/JTN
dočuchat/JN
doďobat/AJTN
dodumlat/JTN
dofrkat/JTN
dohloubat/JTN
dohřívat/JTN
dochlemstat/JN
dochvívat/JN
dokapat/JTN
doklofat/JTN
dokolébat/JTN
dokráčet/AJTN
dokulhat/JN
dokydat/JTN
dolítat/JTN
domatlávat/JTN
domrhat/JTN
donimrat/JN
dopapinkat/JTN
doplácet/JTN
dopočítávat/JTN
doprovázívat/JTN
dorovnat/JTN
dořvávat/JTN
doskuhrat/JN
dosrkat/JTN
dostříkávat/JTN
doškemrat/JN
došourat/JN
došťourat/JTN
dotepávat/JTN
dotřepat/AJTN
doúpět/AJN
dovírat/JTN
dovychovat/JTN
dozaznívat/JN
dozpívávat/JTN
dožlunkat/JN
drchat/JTN
dupat/JTN
exhumovávat/JTN
flirtovávat/JN
hádat/JN
hlásat/JTN
hněvat/JTN
houpat/AJTN
hudrat/JTN
chichotat/JN
chovávat/JTN
chválívat/JTN
indikovávat/JTN
investovávat/JTN
jukat/JN
kastrovávat/JTN
klímat/JN
klubávat/JTN
kolabovávat/JN
konávat/JTN
kooperovávat/JN
koupávat/JTN
krvácet/JN
kuchávat/JTN
kvikat/JN
lapat/JTN
leptat/JTN
lísávat/JN
luskávat/JN
matlávat/JTN
míhat/JN
modelovávat/JTN
mrmlat/JTN
mžikávat/JTN
nablívat/JTN
nabývat/JTN
nacválat/JN
načítat/JTN
nadhánět/JTN
nadrbávat/JTN
nadzvedávat/JN
nahledat/JTN
nahýbávat/JN
nakapávat/JTN
nakmitat/JTN
nakřapat/AJN
nakydat/JTN
náležet/AJN
namatlávat/JTN
namýšlet/JTN
napájet/JTN
naplavávat/JN
naprogramovávat/JTN
narvávat/JTN
naskládávat/JTN
nasoukávat/JTN
nastřihat/JTN
našívat/JTN
našplouchat/JTN
naťapkat/JTN
naťukávat/JTN
navrkat/JN
nazdvihat/JTN
nedbat/J
nocovávat/JN
obelhávat/JTN
obhryzávat/JTN
obkopávat/JTN
oblítat/JTN
obpínat/JTN
obsílat/JTN
obtékat/JTN
obvrtávat/JTN
očesávat/JTN
odbelhávat/JN
odcucat/JTN
oddělávat/JTN
odepínat/JTN
odfoukat/JTN
odhopsat/JN
odinstalovávat/JTN
odklápět/AJTN
odkopat/AJTN
odkvétat/JN
odlítat/JTN
odmítat/JTN
odpálkovávat/JTN
odpočítávat/JTN
odprýskat/JTN
odrýpávat/JTN
odskakovávat/JTN
odstříhat/JTN
odškrabovat/JTN
odtesávat/JTN
odvalovávat/JTN
odvykat/JTN
ofoukávat/JTN
ohrávat/JTN
okapat/JTN
okoukat/JTN
olamovávat/JTN
omeškávat/JTN
oolejovávat/JTN
opevňovávat/JTN
opodkuřovávat/JTN
orat/AJTN
oscilovávat/JN
osprchovávat/JTN
osypat/AJTN
ošoupat/AJTN
otlapkat/JTN
otvírat/JTN
ozdravět/JTN
ožužlávat/JTN
parodovávat/JTN
píchat/JTN
plandat/JN
plovávat/JN
pobodat/JTN
poctívat/JTN
počůrat/JTN
podehnívat/JTN
podchytávat/JTN
podlétat/JTN
podobávat/JN
podsekat/JTN
podupávat/JTN
pohlavkovávat/JTN
pohryzat/AJTN
pochvalovávat/JN
pokaňkat/JTN
poklofat/JTN
pokrouhávat/JTN
poleptat/JTN
pomíjet/JTN
ponořovávat/JTN
popínat/JN
popolézat/JN
popukat/JN
porvávat/JTN
poschovávat/JTN
posnídat/JTN
postříhat/JTN
poškrabat/AJTN
potahovávat/JTN
potrvám/JN
poválet/JTN
povyprávět/JN
pozměňovávat/JTN
pozvracet/JTN
predikovávat/JTN
problikávat/JN
procapat/JTN
procválat/JTN
prodělat/JTN
produsat/JN
proházet/AJTN
prohrkat/JN
proinvestovávat/JTN
proklamovávat/JTN
proklubávat/JTN
prokrvavět/AJN
prolíbat/JTN
promeškat/JTN
promrskat/JTN
propájet/JTN
proplakávat/JTN
propovídat/JTN
prosázet/JTN
prostavět/AJTN
prosýchat/JN
proškrtat/JTN
prošuškat/JTN
protlachat/JTN
provázet/JTN
provykládat/JTN
prozobávat/JTN
přebalovávat/JTN
přecejchovávat/JTN
přečkávat/JTN
předčmuchat/JTN
předhlodat/JTN
předkousávat/JTN
předprogramovávat/JTN
předšívat/JTN
předvrtávat/JTN
přeházet/AJTN
přehrabovávat/JTN
přejásat/JTN
překlepat/AJTN
překonfigurovávat/JTN
překřikovávat/JTN
přeloudat/JN
přemrzat/JN
přepadat/JTN
přeplácat/JTN
přepracovávat/JTN
přeřezat/AJTN
přeskakovávat/JTN
přestřihat/JTN
přeškolovávat/JTN
přetahat/JTN
přetrhávat/JTN
převázávat/JTN
přezimovávat/JN
přežvykovávat/JTN
přicválávat/JN
přihánět/JTN
přichystat/JTN
přikopírovávat/JN
přilétávat/JN
přimontovávat/JTN
připalovávat/JTN
připojovávat/JTN
přiřezávat/JTN
přistávat/JN
přisýpat/JTN
přitakat/JN
přivařovávat/JTN
přivydělávat/JN
pusinkovávat/JTN
referovávat/JTN
reportovávat/JTN
rolovávat/JTN
rozbodat/JTN
rozburácet/JN
rozčilovávat/JTN
rozdoutnat/JN
rozebírat/JTN
rozestavět/AJTN
rozezpívávat/JTN
rozhlížet/JN
rozhýbávat/JN
rozjídávat/JTN
rozkmitat/JTN
rozkoukávat/JN
rozkřesávat/JTN
rozkývat/JTN
rozlouskávat/JTN
rozmílat/JTN
roznimrat/JN
rozpínat/JTN
rozpomínat/JTN
rozptylovávat/JTN
rozsedávat/JTN
rozstříhat/JTN
rozšívat/JTN
rozštěbetávat/JN
roztikat/JTN
rozúčtovávat/JTN
rozvíjet/JTN
rozzobávat/JTN
ručkovávat/JN
říjet/AJN
sbíhávat/JTN
sčesávat/JTN
sedlávat/JTN
sesbírat/JTN
sestřelovávat/JTN
seškrabovat/JTN
setrvat/JN
sežvýkat/JTN
scházet/JN
sjednat/JTN
sklepat/AJTN
skrajovávat/JTN
skýtat/JTN
slisovávat/JTN
smečovávat/JTN
smontovávat/JTN
sníst/JTN
spáchat/JTN
spínat/JTN
spoludělat/JT
spoluutvářet/AJTN
spoutávat/JTN
ssledovávat/JTN
sterilizovávat/JTN
stonávat/JN
střádat/JTN
střízlivět/JN
svázávat/JTN
sypávat/JTN
šišlat/JTN
šlapávat/JN
šrotovávat/JTN
šukat/JTN
těkávat/JN
tikávat/JN
toulat/JN
trsat/JN
tunelovávat/JTN
ubodávat/JTN
ucumlat/JTN
udrbat/AJTN
uhlídat/JTN
uchlastat/JTN
ukázňovávat/JTN
uklovat/JTN
ukrouhat/JTN
ulpívat/JN
umírávat/JN
upalovávat/JTN
uplácat/JTN
upřesňovávat/JTN
uschovat/JTN
usmýšlet/JTN
ustřihat/JTN
uškrabávat/JTN
utěsňovávat/JTN
utloukávat/JTN
úvěrovávat/JTN
uzobat/AJTN
vázávat/JTN
vdávat/JTN
veslovávat/JN
vchlipovávat/JTN
vkopat/AJTN
vlákat/JTN
vměstnávat/JTN
voperovávat/JTN
vrážet/AJTN
vřískávat/JN
vstřikovávat/JTN
vtékat/JN
vybalovávat/JTN
vybojovávat/JTN
vybujet/JN
vycukat/JN
vyčichávat/JN
vydat/JTN
vydovádět/JTN
vydýmat/JTN
vyhecovávat/JTN
vyhrabávat/JTN
vycházívat/JN
vyjednat/JTN
vykasávat/JTN
vyklopýtat/JN
vykorespondovávat/JTN
vykrouhávat/JTN
vykvedlat/JTN
vylínat/JTN
vymazávat/JTN
vymrzávat/JTN
vynechat/JTN
vypařovávat/JTN
vypižlat/JTN
vypomáhat/JN
vyprofilovávat/JTN
vyrovnávat/JTN
vyříkat/JTN
vysilovávat/JTN
vysnívat/JTN
vystavět/AJTN
vystřílet/JTN
vyškemrat/JTN
vyšplíchat/JTN
vytahat/JTN
vytipovávat/JTN
vytřásat/JTN
vyvářet/AJTN
vyvolat/JTN
vyzkoušet/JTN
vyzvánět/JTN
vyžvýkávat/JTN
vzkvétat/JN
vzpouzet/JTN
zabíhat/JTN
zabreptat/JTN
zabzíkat/JN
zacukat/JN
začesávat/JTN
zadírat/JTN
zadýchávat/JN
zahlašovávat/JTN
zahrkotat/JN
zachechtat/JN
zaintegrovávat/JTN
zakalovávat/JTN
zaklikat/JN
zakoktávat/JTN
zakrakat/JTN
zakulacovávat/JTN
zakysat/AJTN
zalhávat/JTN
zamazávat/JTN
zamlaskat/JN
zamžikat/JN
zaobírat/JN
zaparkovávat/JTN
zaplápolat/JTN
zaposlouchat/JTN
zapřemýšlet/JN
zarůstat/JN
zasedávat/JTN
zaslzet/AJN
zastříhat/JTN
zašeptat/JTN
zaškytat/JN
zaštěkat/JTN
zatékat/JN
zatoulat/JTN
zauzlovávat/JTN
zavítat/JN
zavzpomínat/JTN
zažíhat/JTN
zbíhat/JTN
zcuchat/JTN
zdokonolovávat/JTN
zdůrazňovávat/JTN
zesilovávat/JTN
zezelenávat/JN
zchlupatět/JN
zkapalnět/AJTN
zkopírovávat/JTN
zkratovávat/JTN
zlíbat/JTN
zmetávat/JTN
zmrzoutět/JN
znechucovávat/JTN
znovuožívat/J
zorávat/JTN
zpitomět/AJN
zpráchnivět/JN
zrávat/JN
zřít/JTN
ztrhávat/JTN
zvážnět/AJN
zvolat/JTN
žhnout/JN
